Hawaii, session 2025, HB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part X to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§291C-     Speed limits for certain vehicles; penalties. (a)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no person shall drive a motor vehicle with three or more axles or a motor vehicle weighing more than ten thousand pounds, except for school or public buses, at a speed exceeding: (1)  Fifty miles per hour or more irrespective of the applicable state or county speed limit; or (2)  Five miles per hour less than the applicable state or county speed limit. (b)  This section shall not apply to a motor vehicle with three or more axles when: (1)  Actively overtaking and passing another vehicle traveling in the same direction in compliance with applicable traffic laws; and (2)  Utilizing the left lane for the purpose of making a left turn, exiting, or preparing to do so. (c)  Any person violating this section shall be fined no less than $150 for the first offense and no more than $350 for any subsequent offense within a two-year period. (d) This section shall apply only to a county with a population of five hundred thousand or more; provided that a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand may adopt an ordinance to establish the restrictions provided for in this section. (e)  For the purposes of this section, "motor vehicle with three or more axles" means a vehicle with a Federal Highway Administration vehicle category classification of six or higher." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.